New York, session 2025-2026, A7979.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Alexandra's Law." 3 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 804-e to 4 read as follows: 5 § 804-e. Rip current, rip tide and undertow curriculum or instruction. 6 1. School districts and charter schools, in consultation with the Ameri- 7 can Red Cross and any other appropriate agency, shall include instruc- 8 tion on teaching students how to recognize and react to rip currents, 9 rip tides and undertows in an appropriate place in the curriculum of 10 middle school and high school students. 11 2. School districts and charter schools shall have policies and proce- 12 dures in place pertaining to the selection of instructional materials to 13 implement the requirements of subdivision one of this section. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026 and shall apply to school 15 years commencing on or after such date. Effective immediately, the addi- 16 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 17 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 18 be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11387-02-5